Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.050

Foreign nationals—Contributions, expenditures, and electioneering prohibited. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) A foreign national may not make a contribution to any candidate or political committee, make an expenditure in support of or in opposition to any candidate or ballot measure, or sponsor political advertising or an electioneering communication.

(2) A person may not make a contribution to any candidate or political committee, make an expenditure in support of or in opposition to any candidate or ballot measure, or sponsor political advertising or an electioneering communication, if:

(a) The contribution, expenditure, political advertising, or electioneering communication is financed in any part by a foreign national; or

(b) Foreign nationals are involved in making decisions regarding the contribution, expenditure, political advertising, or electioneering communication in any way.

[ 2024 c 164 s 447; 2020 c 152 s 9. Formerly RCW 42.17A.417.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Findings—2020 c 152: "The legislature finds that the First Amendment rights of freedom of speech and free association, as they relate to participating in elections, are core values in the United States. The United States supreme court has repeatedly held that these rights include the right to make campaign contributions in support of candidates and ballot measures at the federal, state, and local levels.

The legislature also finds, in accordance with federal law, that these rights are reserved solely for citizens of the United States and permanent legal residents, whether they act as individuals or in association. The First Amendment protection for political speech does not apply to foreign nationals, who are forbidden under 52 U.S.C. Sec. 30121 from directly or indirectly making political contributions or financing independent expenditures and electioneering communications, either individually or collectively through a corporation or other association. Furthermore, federal law prohibits any person from knowingly soliciting or receiving contributions from a foreign national. Therefore, it falls to individual states to help protect the prohibition on foreign influence in our state and local elections by requiring certification that contributions, expenditures, political advertising, and electioneering communications are not financed in any part by foreign nationals and that foreign nationals are not involved in making decisions regarding such election activity in any way." [ 2020 c 152 s 1.]

Local regulations not preempted—2020 c 152: "Chapter 152, Laws of 2020 does not affect or modify the power of a local government to adopt an ordinance or regulation on matters governed by chapter 152, Laws of 2020." [ 2020 c 152 s 11. Formerly RCW 42.17A.920.]